Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2791.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 16-91-2 and 16-91-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-91 entitled
"School and Youth Programs Concussion Act" are hereby amended to read as follows:
16-91-2. Definitions.
(1) “Healthcare professional” means a person who is licensed or registered under the laws
of this state as a physician, a chiropractic physician, a naturopathic physician, a psychologist, a
physical therapist, an occupational therapist, a physician assistant or a nurse practitioner.
(2) “Public education provider” means a school district, a public charter school or an
education service district.
(3) For the purpose of this section, the term “youth “Youth sports programs” means any
program organized for recreational and/or athletic competition purposes by any school district or
by any school participating in Rhode Island Interscholastic League Competition, and whose
participants are nineteen (19) years of age or younger.
16-91-3. School district’s guidelines to be developed and implemented School
district’s guidelines for student athletes.
(a) The department of education and the department of health shall work in concert with
the Rhode Island Interscholastic League to develop and promulgate guidelines to inform and
educate coaches, teachers, school nurses, youth athletes, and their parents and/or guardians of the
nature and risk of concussion and head injury, including continuing to play after concussion or head
injury. A concussion and head injury information sheet shall be signed and returned by the youth

athlete and the athlete’s parent and/or guardian prior to the youth athlete’s return to practice or
competition.
(b) School districts are required to use training materials made available by the United
States Center for Disease Control and Prevention entitled “Heads Up: Concussion in the High
School Sports/Concussion in Youth Sports” and any updates or amendments thereto, or training
materials substantively and substantially similar thereto. The department of education shall post
training materials made available by the Center for Disease Control and Prevention and the Rhode
Island Interscholastic League on its website. All coaches and volunteers involved in a youth sport
or activity covered by this chapter must complete a training course and a refresher course annually
thereafter in concussions and traumatic brain injuries. All school nurses must complete a training
course and an annual refresher course in concussions and traumatic brain injuries. Teachers and
teachers’ aides are strongly encouraged to complete the training course in concussions and
traumatic brain injuries. Training may consist of videos, classes, and any other generally accepted
mode and medium of providing information.
(c) School districts are encouraged to have all student athletes perform baseline
neuropsychological testing, computerized or otherwise. Parents and/or guardians shall be provided
with information as to the risk of concussion and/or traumatic brain injuries prior to the start of
every sport season and they shall sign an acknowledgement as to their receipt of such information.
(d) A youth athlete, who is suspected of sustaining a concussion or head injury in a practice
or game, shall be removed from competition at that time.
(e) A youth athlete, who has been removed from play, may not return to play until the
athlete is evaluated by a licensed physician who may consult with an athletic trainer, all of whom
shall be trained in the evaluation and management of concussions. The athlete must receive written
clearance to return to play from that licensed physician.
(f) All school districts are encouraged to have an athletic trainer, or similarly trained
person, at all recreational and athletic events addressed by this statute.
SECTION 2. Chapter 16-91 of the General Laws entitled "School and Youth Programs
Concussion Act" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
16-91-3.1. Form required.
(a) The department of education shall develop a form for public education programs to use
when a student has been diagnosed with a concussion or other brain injury.
(b) The form required under this section must describe academic accommodations that a
public education program may make for a student who has been diagnosed with a concussion or
other brain injury. The accommodations must be optional for a public education program to provide
LC005765 - Page 2 of 5

and must be nonmedical.
(c) The department must distribute the form developed under this section as soon as
practicable to public education programs when:
(1) The public education program receives notice that a student has been diagnosed with a
concussion or other brain injury; or
(2) Requested by an educator, a program employee, a student, a parent or a guardian.
(d) Nothing in this subsection requires a public education program to provide any or all of
the academic accommodation described on the form.
(e) The state board of elementary and secondary education may adopt any rules and
regulations necessary for the implementation of this section.
16-91-3.2. Temporary accommodation plan for concussed students.
(a) The department of education shall establish a procedure for public education providers
to use to develop and implement an immediate and temporary accommodations plan for a student
who has been diagnosed with a concussion or other brain injury by a health care professional to
ensure the safety and recovery of the student and to reduce the risk of reinjury or additional injury
to the student.
(b) Upon receiving written notification from a parent or guardian that a student has been
diagnosed with a concussion or other brain injury by a healthcare professional and that
accommodations are being requested, a public education provider shall initiate the procedure to
develop and implement an immediate and temporary accommodations plan.
(c) The procedure to develop and implement an immediate and temporary accommodations
plan shall be used by a public education provider to:
(1) Determine if immediate physical activity limitations are necessary to ensure the safety
and recovery of the student and to minimize the risk of reinjury or additional injury to the student,
including activities such as physical education, recess, unstructured play and similar activities
provided by or sponsored through the public education provider that involve running, jumping,
climbing, throwing, catching or other movements that pose a risk of falls, collisions or physical
injury. The public education provider shall implement any immediate physical activity limitations
determined to be necessary.
(2) Describe present challenges and symptoms associated with the student’s concussion or
other brain injury.
(3) Identify and implement immediate and temporary academic, social-emotional,
behavioral or other necessary accommodations determined to be appropriate for the student to
support meaningful participation in educational activities at a level that is appropriate for the
LC005765 - Page 3 of 5

student’s recovery.
(4) Communicate accommodations identified under this section with:
(i) All teachers who provide instruction to the student; and
(ii) Other employees of the public education provider who have regular responsibilities for
the student’s supervision or health, including school nurses, counselors, physical education
teachers, coaches, athletic trainers and staff supervising recess or other physical activities.
(5) Ensure that the accommodations identified under this section are:
(i) In effect no later than ten (10) school days after written notification has been received
by the public education provider regarding the concussion or other brain injury; and
(ii) Reviewed as needed, but no later than every two months, based on the students’
recovery.
(d) The department shall make available to all public education providers the procedure
and sample form developed under this section.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005765
========
LC005765 - Page 4 of 5